Utah statutes.
32B-5-305.   Pricing of alcoholic product -- Other charge.

(1) (a)  A retail licensee may sell, offer for sale, or furnish liquor only at a price fixed by the commission.

(b)  A retail licensee may not sell an alcoholic product at a discount price on any date or at any time.

(2) (a)  A retail licensee may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product at less than the cost of the alcoholic product to the retail licensee.

(b)  A retail licensee may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product at a special or reduced price that encourages over consumption or intoxication.

(c)  A retail licensee may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an alcoholic product at a special or reduced price for only certain hours of the retail licensee's business day, such as a "happy hour."

(d)  A retail licensee may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish more than one alcoholic product for the price of a single alcoholic product.

(e)  A retail licensee may not sell, offer for sale, or furnish an indefinite or unlimited number of alcoholic products during a set period for a fixed price.

(f)  A retail licensee may not engage in a promotion involving or offering a free alcoholic product to the general public.

(3)  As authorized by commission rule, a retail licensee may charge a patron for providing:

(a)  a service related to liquor purchased at the licensed premises; or

(b)  wine service performed for wine carried in by a patron in accordance with Section 32B-5-307.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

